suomimalaga/vvfst/taivutuskaavat.lexc
LEXICON NomNainen_a
[Sn][Ny]nen:nen	#	;
[Sn][Nm]set:set	#	;
[Sine][Ny]sessa:sessa	#	;

LEXICON NomNainen_ä
[Sn][Ny]nen:nen	#	;
[Sn][Nm]set:set	#	;
[Sine][Ny]sessä:sessä	#	;

LEXICON NomNainen_aä
[Sn][Ny]nen:nen	#	;
[Sn][Nm]set:set	#	;
[Sine][Ny]sessa:sessa	#	;
[Sine][Ny]sessä:sessä	#	;
